test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_NoExtra_abwaanaak_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakinaanibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakinaanibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2abwaanaak+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giabwaanaakiwaaibanan
     +Px2abwaanaak+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakiwaaibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakiwaaibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2abwaanaak+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giabwaanaakiniibanan
     +Px2abwaanaak+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giabwaanaakiniibanag
     +Px2abwaanaak+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giabwaanaakiniibaning
     +Px2abwaanaak+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giabwaanaakini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2abwaanaak+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giabwaanaakini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2abwaanaak+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giabwaanaakini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakinaanibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakinaanibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakinaanibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakiwaaibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakiwaaibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakiwaaibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3abwaanaak+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oabwaanaakiniibanan
     +Px3abwaanaak+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oabwaanaakiniibanag
     +Px3abwaanaak+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oabwaanaakiniibaning
     +Px3abwaanaak+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oabwaanaakini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3abwaanaak+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oabwaanaakini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3abwaanaak+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oabwaanaakini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: abwaanaakensimishinaan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: abwaanaakensimishiwaa
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: abwaanaakensimishini
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: abwaanaakenhimishinaan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: abwaanaakenhimishiwaa
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: abwaanaakenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: abwaanaakensimishiban
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: abwaanaakensimish***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: abwaanaakenhimishiban
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: abwaanaakenhimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 7
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: abwaanaakensimishan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: abwaanaakensimishag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: abwaanaakensimishing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: abwaanaakenhimishan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: abwaanaakenhimishag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: abwaanaakenhimishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: abwaanaakensiminaaniban
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: abwaanaakensiminaan***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: abwaanaakensimiwaaiban
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: abwaanaakensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: abwaanaakensiminiiban
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: abwaanaakensimini***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: abwaanaakenhiminaaniban
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: abwaanaakenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: abwaanaakenhimiwaaiban
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: abwaanaakenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: abwaanaakenhiminiiban
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: abwaanaakenhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: abwaanaakensiminaanan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: abwaanaakensiminaanag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: abwaanaakensiminaaning
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: abwaanaakensimiwaaan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: abwaanaakensimiwaaag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: abwaanaakensimiwaaing
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: abwaanaakensiminian
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: abwaanaakensiminiag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: abwaanaakensiminiing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: abwaanaakenhiminaanan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: abwaanaakenhiminaanag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: abwaanaakenhiminaaning
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: abwaanaakenhimiwaaan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: abwaanaakenhimiwaaag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: abwaanaakenhimiwaaing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: abwaanaakenhiminian
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: abwaanaakenhiminiag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: abwaanaakenhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakensimibanan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakensimibanag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakensimibaning
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakensim***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakensim***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakensim***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakenhimibanan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakenhimibanag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakenhimibaning
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakenhim***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakenhim***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: abwaanaakensishinaaniban
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: abwaanaakensishinaan***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: abwaanaakensishiwaaiban
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: abwaanaakensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: abwaanaakensishiniiban
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: abwaanaakensishini***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: abwaanaakenhishinaaniban
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: abwaanaakenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: abwaanaakenhishiwaaiban
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: abwaanaakenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: abwaanaakenhishiniiban
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: abwaanaakenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: abwaanaakensishinaanan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: abwaanaakensishinaanag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: abwaanaakensishinaaning
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: abwaanaakensishiwaaan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: abwaanaakensishiwaaag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: abwaanaakensishiwaaing
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: abwaanaakensishinian
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: abwaanaakensishiniag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: abwaanaakensishiniing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: abwaanaakenhishinaanan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: abwaanaakenhishinaanag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: abwaanaakenhishinaaning
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: abwaanaakenhishiwaaan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: abwaanaakenhishiwaaag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: abwaanaakenhishiwaaing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: abwaanaakenhishinian
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: abwaanaakenhishiniag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: abwaanaakenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakensishibanan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakensishibanag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakensishibaning
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakensish***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakensish***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakensish***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakenhishibanan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakenhishibanag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakenhishibaning
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakenhish***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakenhish***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakensinaanibanan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakensinaanibanag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakensinaanibaning
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakensinaan***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakensiwaaibanan
     abwaanaak+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakensiwaaibanag
     abwaanaak+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakensiwaaibaning
     abwaanaak+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakensiniibanan
     abwaanaak+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakensiniibanag
     abwaanaak+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakensiniibaning
     abwaanaak+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakensini***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakensini***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakensini***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakenhinaanibanan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakenhinaanibanag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakenhinaanibaning
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakenhiwaaibanan
     abwaanaak+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakenhiwaaibanag
     abwaanaak+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakenhiwaaibaning
     abwaanaak+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     abwaanaak+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakenhiniibanan
     abwaanaak+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakenhiniibanag
     abwaanaak+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakenhiniibaning
     abwaanaak+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaakenhini***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaakenhini***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaakenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: abwaanaakimishinaaniban
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: abwaanaakimishinaan***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: abwaanaakimishiwaaiban
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: abwaanaakimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: abwaanaakimishiniiban
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: abwaanaakimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: abwaanaakimishinaanan
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: abwaanaakimishinaanag
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: abwaanaakimishinaaning
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: abwaanaakimishiwaaan
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: abwaanaakimishiwaaag
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: abwaanaakimishiwaaing
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: abwaanaakimishinian
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: abwaanaakimishiniag
